Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.392

United States vocational education account—Abolished.

From and after the first day of August, 1957, the United States vocational education account in the general fund is abolished.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.79.392. Prior: 1957 c 226 s 3.]